Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3541
Hospital district; annexation or withdrawal; resubmission.

If the question of annexation or withdrawal is defeated at the polls, it may again be submitted after the expiration of one year.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 13, p. 379;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.32.